Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4003.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1073b. The portion of highway US-131 in Mecosta County between the intersection of highway US-131 and 11 Mile Road and the intersection of highway US-131 and Old State Road shall be known as the Sgt. Matthew Webber Memorial Highway. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor